District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Expanding Community Access to Safe and Clean Recreational Space
Act of 2023”.

Sec. 2. Establishment of Partnership between DPR and DCPS for Security and Custodial
Services during Hours of Community Use.
(a)(1) The Department of Parks and Recreation (“DPR") shall establish a program
in partnership with District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”) to expand safe and sanitary

community access to recreational facilities in every ward on evenings and weekends, outside of
the hours in which the facilities are in active use by the schools and student activities.
(2) Incorporating experience and lessons learned from implementing the
Community Access to Recreational Space Pilot Program funded in Fiscal Year 2024, DPR shall
enter an annual agreement with DCPS to determine the hours of community use at participating
DCPS sites, at times that would not interfere with school- and student-related activities. The
agreement shall address the following issues:
(A) Hours of community use at the site;
(B) Signage to be posted indicating community use hours;
(C) Communication process and procedures when a school needs
to hold a special event at the recreational facilities during the hours previously determined to be
open for community use; and
(D) Description of security and custodial services at the site to be
provided as described in subsection (b).
(3) In identifying participating sites, DPR shall:
(A) Establish at least one program site in each ward across the
District;
(B) Consider sites that would increase access to recreational space
for communities that have experienced historical disinvestment, high levels of traffic incidences,
crime and public safety challenges, and high rates of weight-related chronic disease;
(C) Consider sites located in Recreation Center Gaps, Playground
Gaps, Fields Gaps, Basketball Courts Gaps, and Tennis Courts Gaps, as identified by the

Ready2PLAY Parks and Recreation Master Plan or most updated Parks and Recreation Master
Plan;
(D) Consider sites that could serve as flexible use space during
planned renovations of other nearby recreational facilities, especially where renovations may be
extended and will create a temporary Recreation Center Gap, Playground Gap, Fields Gap,
Basketball Courts Gap, or Tennis Courts Gap;
(E) Establish a process by which residents and school leadership
may nominate sites for program participation; and
(F) Consider nominations by resident and school leadership,
provided that nomination shall not be a requirement for participation.
(b) During all evening and weekend hours in which the facilities are open to the
public, DPR shall facilitate security and custodial services as necessary to allow the safe and
sanitary use of public recreation amenities, either directly, through a District agency partner, or
through another third party.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December

24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)2)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.